Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.030

Continuation of memberships, powers, duties, etc.

On and after the commencement of a succeeding regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year, those members of the committee who continue to be members of the senate and house, respectively, shall continue as members of the committee as indicated in RCW 44.48.020 and the committee shall continue with all its powers, duties, authorities, records, papers, personnel and staff, and all funds made available for its use.

[ 1980 c 87 s 42; 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 3.]